District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.04

Withdrawal of filed record before effectiveness.

(a)

The parties to a filed record may withdraw the record before it takes effect.

(b)

To withdraw a filed record, the parties to the record shall deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of withdrawal.

(c)

A statement of withdrawal shall:

(1)

Except as otherwise agreed by the parties, be signed on behalf of each party that signed the filed record being withdrawn;

(2)

Identify the filed record to be withdrawn, the date of its filing, and the parties to it; and

(3)

If not filed by all parties, state that the filed record has been withdrawn in accordance with the agreement of the parties.

(d)

Upon filing by the Mayor of a statement of withdrawal, the action or transaction evidenced by the original filed record shall not take effect.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(6), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-102.12, § 29-608.12, § 29-708.10, and § 29-807.06.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “’Upon filing by” for “On the delivery for filing to” in (d).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.